incubator/apertium-mal/dev/latin/apertium-mal.mal.lexc
LEXICON NP2

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:yil‍ CLIT-N-LOC; ! "yil‍"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ye CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ye"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:yuṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "yuṭe"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:yk CLIT-N ; ! "yk"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<voc%>:̔ē #; ! ""

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<sg%>:ya N-CASES-SG ; ! ""
!plural
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:mār‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:māril‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "mār‍"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:māre CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "māre"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:māruṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "māruṭe"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:mār‍k CLIT-N ; ! "mār‍k"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:mārēāṭ CLIT-N ; ! "mārēāṭ"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<vov%>:mārē # ; ! ""
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:mārāl‍ CLIT-N ; ! "mārāl‍"

LEXICON NP3

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:̔u CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:̔uvil‍ CLIT-N-LOC; ! "yil‍"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:̔uvine CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ye"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:̔uvinṟe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "uvinṟe"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:̔uvin CLIT-N ; ! "yk"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>:̔uvina N-CASES-SG ; ! ""
!plural
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:̔umār‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "mār‍"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:̔umāril‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "māril‍"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:̔umāre CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "māre"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:̔umāruṭe CLIT-N ; ! "umāruṭe"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:̔umār‍k CLIT-N ; ! "mār‍k"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:̔umārēāṭ CLIT-N ; ! "mārēāṭ"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:̔umārāl‍ CLIT-N ; ! "mārāl‍"

LEXICON NP4

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:yil‍ CLIT-N-LOC; ! "yil‍"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ye CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ye"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:yuṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "yuṭe"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:yk CLIT-N ; ! "yk"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<voc%>:̔ē #; ! ""

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>:ya N-CASES-SG ; ! ""
!plural
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:mār‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:māril‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "mār‍"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:māre CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "māre"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:māruṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "māruṭe"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:mār‍k CLIT-N ; ! "mār‍k"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:mārēāṭ CLIT-N ; ! "mārēāṭ"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<vov%>:mārē # ; ! ""
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:mārāl‍ CLIT-N ; ! "mārāl‍"

LEXICON NP5 ! "endind with chillu nel‍saṇ‍"

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:̔il‍ CLIT-N-LOC; ! "yil‍"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:̔e CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ye"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:̔inṟe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "yuṭe"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:̔in CLIT-N ; ! "yk"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:̔inu CLIT-N ; ! "n" ! "debug"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<voc%>:nēā #; ! ""
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>: N-CASES-SG ; ! ""
!plural
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:mār‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:māril‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "mār‍"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:māre CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "māre"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:māruṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "māruṭe"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:mār‍k CLIT-N ; ! "mār‍k"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:mārēāṭ CLIT-N ; ! "mārēāṭ"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<vov%>:mārē # ; ! ""
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:mārāl‍ CLIT-N ; ! "mārāl‍"

LEXICON NP4-COG

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:yil‍ CLIT-N-LOC; ! "yil‍"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ye CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ye"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:yuṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "yuṭe"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:yk CLIT-N ; ! "yk"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:kk CLIT-N ; ! "yk"  ! "debug"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<voc%>:̔ē #; ! ""

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>:ya N-CASES-SG ; ! ""
!plural
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:mār‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:māril‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "mār‍"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:māre CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "māre"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:māruṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "māruṭe"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:mār‍k CLIT-N ; ! "mār‍k"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:mārēāṭ CLIT-N ; ! "mārēāṭ"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<vov%>:mārē # ; ! ""
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:mārāl‍ CLIT-N ; ! "mārāl‍"

LEXICON NP5-COG ! "endind with chillu nel‍saṇ‍"

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:̔il‍ CLIT-N-LOC; ! "yil‍"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:̔e CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ye"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:̔inṟe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "yuṭe"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:̔in CLIT-N ; ! "yk"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:̔inu CLIT-N ; ! "n" ! "debug"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<voc%>:nēā #; ! ""
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>: N-CASES-SG ; ! ""
!plural
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:mār‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:māril‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "mār‍"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:māre CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "māre"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:māruṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "māruṭe"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:mār‍k CLIT-N ; ! "mār‍k"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:mārēāṭ CLIT-N ; ! "mārēāṭ"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<vov%>:mārē # ; ! ""
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:mārāl‍ CLIT-N ; ! "mārāl‍"

LEXICON NP-TOP-KERALA

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ṁ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:tte	CLIT-N-ACC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ttinṟe CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ttin CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ttāl‍  CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ttil‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:ttēāṭ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:# ; !"" !FIXME ! DEBUG

LEXICON NP-TOP-INDIA

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ye	CLIT-N-ACC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:yuṭe CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:yk CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:yāl‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:yil‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:yēāṭ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""

LEXICON NP-TOP-CALICUT

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:̔ine	CLIT-N-ACC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:̔inṟe CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:̔in CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:̔ināl‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:̔il‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:̔inēāṭ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
LEXICON NP-TOP-KANNUR

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:̔ine	CLIT-N-ACC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:̔inṟe CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:̔in CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:̔ināl‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:̔il‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:̔inēāṭ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
LEXICON NP-TOP-MALABAR

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:r‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ṟine	CLIT-N-ACC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ṟinṟe CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ṟin CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ṟināl‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ṟil‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:ṟinēāṭ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
LEXICON NP-TOP-JAPAN

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:n‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ne	CLIT-N-ACC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:nṟe CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:n CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:nāl‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:nil‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:nēāṭ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""

LEXICON ProperNouns 
mēri:mēri NP2 ; ! "mēri" ! "Mary"
kyūṟi:kyūṟi NP2 ; ! "cury"
rāju:rāja NP3 ; ! "rāju" ! "Raju"
rādha:rādha NP2 ; ! "rādha" ! "Radha"
jēāṇ‍:jēāṇa NP5; ! ""
pēāḷ‍:pēāḷa NP5; ! ""
mār‍ppāppa:mār‍ppāppa NP4; ! ""
mahātmāgāndhi:mahātmāgāndhi NP4;
gāndhi:gāndhi NP4; ! ""
alaksāṇṭar‍:alaksāṇṭaṟa NP5; ! ""
yēśu:yēśu NP4; ! ""
jēāṇ‍saṇ‍:jēāṇ‍saṇa NP5; ! ""
amīr‍:amīṟa NP5; ! ""
śivan‍:śivana NP5; ! ""
nel‍saṇ‍:nel‍saṇa NP5;
maṇṭēla:maṇṭēla NP4-COG;
āndre:āndre NP4;
ḍebreyin‍:ḍebreyina NP5-COG; ! ""
keāllaṁ:keālla NP-TOP-KERALA ; ! "kollam"
eṟaṇākuḷaṁ:eṟaṇākuḷa NP-TOP-KERALA; ! ""
bhārataṁ:bhārata NP-TOP-KERALA; ! ""
tiruvitāṅkūr‍:tiruvitāṅkūr‍ NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! ""
sedi:sedi NP-TOP-INDIA; ! ""
keāṭuṅṅallūr‍:keāṭuṅṅallūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! ""
ōsṭrēliya:ōsṭrēliya NP-TOP-INDIA; ! ""
aphgānisthān‍:aphgānisthā NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
bahṟain‍:bahṟai NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
jappān‍:jappā NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
kir‍gistān‍:kir‍gistā NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
likṟṟan‍‌sṟṟain‍:likṟṟan‍‌sṟṟai NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
ṟaṣyan‍% pheḍaṟēṣan‍:ṟaṣyan‍% pheḍaṟēṣa NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
speyin‍:speyi NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
svīḍan‍:svīḍa NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
tur‍kkmenistān‍:tur‍kkmenistā NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
usbekistān‍:usbekistā NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
khasākh‌sthān‍:khasākh‌sthā NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
ōsṭriya:ōsṭriya NP-TOP-INDIA; ! "" ! ""
intya:intya NP-TOP-INDIA; ! "" ! ""
maṅgēāḷiya:maṅgēāḷiya NP-TOP-INDIA; ! "" ! ""
ṭuṇīṣya:ṭuṇīṣya NP-TOP-INDIA; ! "" ! ""
bahāmās:bahāmāsa NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
ḍenmār‍kk:ḍenmār‍kka NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
ayar‍laṇṭ:ayar‍laṇṭa NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
seyṣel‍s:seyṣel‍sa NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
bel‍jiyaṁ:bel‍jiya NP-TOP-KERALA; ! "" ! ""
viyaṟṟnāṁ:viyaṟṟnā NP-TOP-KERALA; ! "" ! ""
jibūṭṭi:jibūṭṭi NP-TOP-INDIA; ! "" ! ""
māli:māli NP-TOP-INDIA; ! "" ! ""
naijar‍:naija NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
maḍagāskar‍:maḍagāska NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
māḷ‍ṭṭa:māḷ‍ṭṭa NP-TOP-INDIA; ! "" ! ""
sāran‍:sāra NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
pāṟṟan‍:pāṟṟa NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
ṟaisen‍:ṟaise NP-TOP-JAPAN; ! "" ! ""
śrīkakkuḷaṁ:śrīkakkuḷa NP-TOP-KERALA; ! "" ! ""
viśākhapaṭṭaṇaṁ:viśākhapaṭṭaṇa NP-TOP-KERALA; ! "" ! ""
as'sāṁ:as'sā NP-TOP-KERALA; ! "" ! ""
īsṟṟ% siṅbhuṁ:īsṟṟ% siṅbhu NP-TOP-KERALA; ! "" ! ""
bel‍gāṁ:bel‍gā NP-TOP-KERALA; ! "" ! ""
tiruvanantapuraṁ:tiruvanantapura NP-TOP-KERALA; ! "" ! ""
kēāṭṭayaṁ:kēāṭṭaya NP-TOP-KERALA; ! "" ! ""
malappuṟaṁ:malappuṟa NP-TOP-KERALA; ! "" ! ""
vāsiṁ:vāsi NP-TOP-KERALA; ! "" ! ""
sēlaṁ:sēla NP-TOP-KERALA; ! "" ! ""
aḍilābād:aḍilābāda NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
vesṟṟ% siyaṅg:vesṟṟ% siyaṅga NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
gēālāghaṭṭ:gēālāghaṭṭa NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
gēāpāl‍gañc:gēāpāl‍gañca NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
aham'madābād:aham'madābāda NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
rāj‌kēāṭṭ:rāj‌kēāṭṭa NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
rēāh‌takh:rēāh‌takha NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
sāhib‌gañc:sāhib‌gañca NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
kāsar‍gēāḍ:kāsar‍gēāḍa NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
nīmūkh:nīmūkha NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
sindhudur‍g:sindhudur‍ga NP-TOP-CALICUT; ! "" ! ""
dhemāji:dhemāji NP-TOP-INDIA; ! "" ! ""
nēār‍tt% īsṟṟ% ḍel‍hi:nēār‍tt% īsṟṟ% ḍel‍hi NP-TOP-INDIA; ! "" ! ""
hāveri:hāveri NP-TOP-INDIA; ! "" ! ""
dhar‍m'mapuri:dhar‍m'mapuri NP-TOP-INDIA; ! "" ! ""
anantapur‍:anantapu NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
ciṟṟūr‍:ciṟṟūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! "" ! ""
kaccār‍:kaccā NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
śivasāgar‍:śivasāga NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
bhēāj‌pūr‍:bhēāj‌pūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! "" ! ""
buksar‍:buksa NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
samastipūr‍:samastipūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! "" ! ""
bastār‍:bastā NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
bilāspur‍:bilāspu NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
gāndhinagar‍:gāndhinaga NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
hisar‍:hisa NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
bilās‌pur‍:bilās‌pu NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
śrīnagar‍:śrīnaga NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
bāṅgaḷūr‍:bāṅgaḷūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! "" ! ""
cānrāja‌% nagar‍:cānrāja‌% naga NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
tuṅgūr‍:tuṅgūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! "" ! ""
kaṇṇūr‍:kaṇṇūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! "" ! ""
bur‍hān‍pur‍:bur‍hān‍pu NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
sāgar‍:sāga NP-TOP-MALABAR; ! "" ! ""
ṣājapūr‍:ṣājapūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! "" ! ""
candrapūr‍:candrapūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! "" ! ""
sēālāpūr‍:sēālāpūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! "" ! ""
kaṭalūr‍:kaṭalūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! "" ! ""
pērāmpallūr‍:pērāmpallūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! "" ! ""
tiruvaḷḷūr‍:tiruvaḷḷūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! "" ! ""
vellūr‍:vellūra NP-TOP-KANNUR; ! "" ! ""
pāṟṟna:pāṟṟna NP-TOP-INDIA; ! "" ! ""
cindhvāra:cindhvāra NP-TOP-INDIA; ! "" ! ""
